Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5089.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 46-4-6.2, 46-4-6.3, 46-4-6.4, 46-4-6.5, 46-4-6.6, 46-4-6.7, 46-4-6.8,
46-4-6.9, 46-4-6.10, 46-4-6.11, 46-4-6.12, 46-4-6.13, 46-4-6.14, 46-4-6.15, 46-4-6.16 and 46-4-
6.17 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-4 entitled "Harbors and Harbor Lines" are hereby amended
to read as follows:
46-4-6.2. Town of Bristol — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14 or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of
the town of Bristol, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Bristol to
enact ordinances as the town council may deem necessary or desirable for the enforcement and
supervision of any rules and regulations established by the town council governing the public
waters and harbors within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and
control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorages within
the public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the
foregoing, the authority and power to regulate waterskiing upon any of the public waters; to
designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary
moorings or anchorages may be maintained; to assign moorings; to remove moorings; to collect
fees for the use of moorings; to provide for minimum mooring specifications; to provide for
inspection of moorings; to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined
in § 42-17.1-46; to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and

exhibitions; and to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks; to
provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving; and to impose penalties for violation of
the ordinances not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding
ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction for any one offense and the fines to be recovered
to the use of the town.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title, as
amended.
46-4-6.3. Town of South Kingstown — Powers conferred.
The provisions of § 46-22-14, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding
and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of South
Kingstown, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of South Kingstown to
authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town
council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any
ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate
by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use
of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town including,
without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on
any of the public waters, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places
where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to
remove moorings, to collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring
specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-
17.1-46, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to
provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties
for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or
imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense,
the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.
46-4-6.4. Town of North Kingstown — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14, or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of
the town of North Kingstown authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of
North Kingstown to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such
authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and
supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its
LC000580 - Page 2 of 14

jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the
size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the
confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and
power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin
diving, and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places
where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to
remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring
specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-
17.1-46, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to
provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties
for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or
imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense,
the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.
46-4-6.5. Town of Tiverton — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14 or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of
the town of Tiverton, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Tiverton to
authorize for the appointment of a harbor commission and by ordinance grant such authority as the
town council may deem necessary or desirable to the harbor commission for the enforcement and
supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its
jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the
size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorages within the public waters within the
confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and
power to regulate waterskiing upon any of the public waters; to designate upon a map of the public
waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be
maintained; to assign moorings; to remove moorings; to collect fees for the use of moorings; to
provide for minimum mooring specifications; to provide for inspection of moorings; to provide
regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-17.1-46; to provide
regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions; to provide for the
removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks; to provide for the regulation of skin
diving, and scuba diving; and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances not exceeding in
amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or
LC000580 - Page 3 of 14

house of correction for any one offense and the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title, as
amended.
46-4-6.6. Town of Newport — Powers conferred.
The provisions of § 46-22-14, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding,
and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the city council of the city of Newport,
authority shall also be granted to the city council of the city of Newport to authorize for the
appointment of a harbor coordinator and by ordinance grant such authority as the city council may
deem necessary to the harbor coordinator for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances,
rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by
ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of
all anchorages and moorings, within the public waters within the confines of the city including,
without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on
any of the public waters, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the city the places
where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to
remove moorings, to collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring
specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-
17.1-46, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to
provide for the removal of wrecks or derelicts or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties
for violators of the ordinances, not to exceed in amount three hundred dollars ($300) or
imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense,
the fines to be recovered to the use of the city.
46-4-6.7. Town of Little Compton — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14, or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of
the town of Little Compton, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Little
Compton to enact ordinances as the town council may deem necessary or desirable for the
enforcement of any rules and regulations established by the town council governing the public
waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of
all vessels and objects and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorages within
the public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the
foregoing, the authority and power to regulate waterskiing upon any of the public waters; to
designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary
LC000580 - Page 4 of 14

moorings or anchorages may be maintained; to assign moorings; to remove moorings; to collect
fees for the use of moorings, the fees to be recovered for use by the town of Little Compton; to
provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide for inspection of moorings; to provide
regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-17.1-46; to regulate the
location and placement of lobster pots, fish traps, and other fishing gear; to provide regulations for
regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions; to provide for the removal of wrecks
and derelicts or abandoned boats or docks; to provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba
diving; to prevent littering and pollution of its public waters; and to impose penalties for violation
of the ordinances not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not
exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction for any one offense and the fines to be
recovered to the use of the town.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.
46-4-6.8. Town of Narragansett — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14 or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of
the town of Narragansett, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of
Narragansett to authorize the appointment of a harbormaster, assistant harbormasters, and a Harbor
Management Committee and to enact such ordinances as the town council may deem necessary or
desirable for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing
the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and
control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the
public waters within the confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the
foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing of any of the public waters, to provide
for the regulation of skin diving, and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters
within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be
maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings,
to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not
self-propelled as defined in § 42-17.1-46, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades,
tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelicts or abandoned boats
or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one
hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days for any one offense, the fines
to be recovered to the use of the town. The town council shall also have the authority to recover the
cost of removing any wreck or derelicts or abandoned boats or docks from the owner or persons
LC000580 - Page 5 of 14

responsible for the wrecks, derelicts, abandoned boats, or docks by suit in either the district court
or the superior court of Washington County.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.
46-4-6.9. Town of Jamestown — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14, or any other provisions notwithstanding, and in addition
to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Jamestown, authority
shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Jamestown to enact ordinances as the town
council may deem necessary or desirable for the enforcement and supervision of any rules and
regulations established by the town council governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and
to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type,
location, and use of all anchorages and moorages within the public waters within the confines of
the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to
regulate waterskiing upon any of the public waters; to designate upon a map of the public waters
within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be
maintained; to assign moorings; to remove moorings; to collect fees for the use of moorings; to
provide for minimum mooring specifications; to provide for inspection of moorings; to provide
regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-17.1-46; to provide
regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions; to provide for the
removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks; to provide for the regulation of skin
diving and scuba diving; and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances not exceeding in
amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or
house of correction for any one offense and the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title, as
amended.
46-4-6.10. Town of New Shoreham — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14, or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority or powers conferred upon the town council of the
town of New Shoreham authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of New
Shoreham to authorize it for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such
authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and
supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its
jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, and
LC000580 - Page 6 of 14

the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the
confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and
power to prohibit waterskiing on any public waters, to designate upon a map of the public waters
within the town, the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be
maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to collect a fee for the use of moorings, to
provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-17.1-46, to provide
regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the
removal of wrecks or derelicts or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violators
of the ordinances, not to exceed in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not
exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be
recovered to the use of the town. The town council shall also have the authority to recover the cost
of removing any wreck or derelicts or abandoned boats or docks from the owner or persons
responsible for the wrecks, derelicts, abandoned boats, or docks by suit in either the district court
or the superior court of Washington County.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title, as
amended.
46-4-6.11. Town of Charlestown — Powers conferred.
(a) In addition to any authority or powers conferred upon the town council of the town of
Charlestown, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Charlestown to
authorize it for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the
town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any
ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate
by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, and the size, type, location, and
use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town,
including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit
waterskiing on any said public waters, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the
town, the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to
assign moorings, to remove moorings, to collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide
regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-17.1-46, to provide
regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the
removal of wrecks or derelicts or abandoned boats, and to impose penalties for violators of the
ordinances, not to exceed in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten
(10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the
LC000580 - Page 7 of 14

use of the town. The town council shall also have the authority to recover the cost of removing any
wreck or derelicts or abandoned boats from the owner or persons responsible for the wrecks,
derelicts, or abandoned boats by suit in either the district court or the superior court of Washington
County.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title, as
amended.
46-4-6.12. Town of Middletown — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14, or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of
the town of Middletown, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of
Middletown to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such
authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and
supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its
jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, both wind
and power, and the number, size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the
public waters within the confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the
foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide
for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters
within the towns the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be
maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings,
to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not
self-propelled as defined in § 42-17.1-46, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades,
tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats
or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one
hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of
correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of said town.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.
46-4-6.13. Town of Portsmouth — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14 or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of
the town of Portsmouth authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of
Portsmouth to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such
LC000580 - Page 8 of 14

authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and
supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its
jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, both wind
and power, and the number, size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the
public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the
foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide
for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters
within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be
maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings,
to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not
self-propelled as defined in § 42-17.1-46, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades,
tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats
or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one
hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of
correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title and,
further, the provisions of this section shall not affect the location or assignment of any moorings
existing on June 27, 1986, except that those deemed by the harbormaster to be located at an
unacceptable site shall be moved should he or she so order.
46-4-6.14. Town of East Greenwich — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14, or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of
the town of East Greenwich, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of East
Greenwich to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such
authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and
supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its
jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, both wind
and power, and the number, size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the
public waters within the confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the
foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide
for the regulation of skindiving and scubadiving, to designate upon a map of the public waters
within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be
maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings,
LC000580 - Page 9 of 14

to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not
self-propelled as defined in § 42-17.1-46, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades,
tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats
or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one
hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of
correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.
46-4-6.15. Town of Cranston — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14, or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the city council of the
city of Cranston, authority shall also be granted to the city council of the city of Cranston to
authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the said
city council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any
ordinances, rules and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by
ordinance the speed, management and control of all vessels, both wind and power, and the number,
size, type, location and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the
confines of the city including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and
power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin
diving and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the city the places
where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to
remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring
specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-
17.1-46, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to
provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties
for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in an amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or
imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense,
the fines to be recovered to the use of the city.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.
46-4-6.16. Town of Warren — Powers conferred.
(a) The provision of § 46-22-14 or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding
and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Warren,
authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Warren to authorize for the
LC000580 - Page 10 of 14

appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem
necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and
regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed,
management, and control of all vessels, both wind and power, and the number, size, type, location,
and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town
including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit
waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba
diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent
or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings,
to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to
provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-17.1-46, to provide
regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the
removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violation
of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not
exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be
recovered to the use of said town.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.
46-4-6.17. Town of Westerly — Powers conferred.
(a) The provisions of § 46-22-14, or any other provisions of the general laws
notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of
the town of Westerly, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Westerly
to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the
town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any
ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by
ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, both wind and power, and the number,
size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the
confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and
power to prohibit water-skiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin
diving and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the towns the places
where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to
remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring
specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled as defined in § 42-
17.1-46, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to
LC000580 - Page 11 of 14

provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties
for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or
imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense,
the fines to be recovered to the use of said town.
(b) No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties
granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-17.1 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Environmental
Management" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-17.1-46. Definition of "houseboat".
For purposes of this chapter:
"Houseboat" means a motorized or non-motorized vessel constructed on a float, raft, or
barge with low freeboard, little or no foredeck or cockpit, that is used as a place of habitation and/or
multi-purpose accommodation which is registered or unregistered. If used as a means of
transportation, this use is secondary. "Houseboat" includes platforms, and waterborne hotels and
restaurants.
SECTION 3. Section 46-22-9.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-22 entitled "Regulation
of Boats" is hereby amended to read as follows:
46-22-9.1. Houseboats — Exclusion from coastal ponds.
(a) No person shall live on a houseboat on any coastal pond in this state.
(b) As used in this section, “houseboat,” means a building constructed on a float, raft, or
barge that is used for single or multiple family habitation or is represented as a place of business.
If used as a means of transportation, this use is secondary. “Houseboat” includes platforms, and
waterborne hotels and restaurants "houseboat" means a motorized or non-motorized vessel
constructed on a float, raft, or barge with low freeboard, little or no foredeck or cockpit, that is used
as a place of habitation and/or multi-purpose accommodation which is registered or unregistered.
If used as a means of transportation, this use is secondary. "Houseboat" includes platforms, and
waterborne hotels and restaurants.
(c) A “coastal pond”, as used in this section, shall be as designated or defined in the rules
and regulations of the coastal resources management council.
SECTION 4. Chapter 46-23 of the General Laws entitled "Coastal Resources Management
Council" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-23-27. Definition of "houseboat".
For purposes of this chapter:
"Houseboat" means a motorized or non-motorized vessel constructed on a float, raft, or
LC000580 - Page 12 of 14

barge with low freeboard, little or no foredeck or cockpit, that is used as a place of habitation and/or
multi-purpose accommodation which is registered or unregistered. If used as a means of
transportation, this use is secondary. "Houseboat" includes platforms, and waterborne hotels and
restaurants.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000580
========
LC000580 - Page 13 of 14